Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB519.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 305(b) and (b.1) of the act of April 12, 1951 (P.L.90, No.21), known as the Liquor Code, amended July 15, 2024 (P.L.700, No.57) and July 17, 2024 (P.L.924, No.86), are amended to read:Section 305. Sales by Pennsylvania Liquor Stores.--* * *(b) Every Pennsylvania Liquor Store shall sell liquors, 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526 including wine and ready-to-drink cocktails, at wholesale to hotels, restaurants, clubs, and railroad, pullman and steamship companies licensed under this act; and ready-to-drink cocktails to distributors and importing distributors that hold a ready-to-drink cocktail permit; and, under the regulations of the board, to pharmacists duly licensed and registered under the laws of the Commonwealth, and to manufacturing pharmacists, and to reputable hospitals approved by the board, or chemists. Sales to licensees shall be made at a price that includes a discount of ten per centum from the retail price; except that special order sales to licensees authorized in subsection (a) shall not be subject to the ten per centum discount. The board may sell to registered pharmacists only such liquors as conform to the Pharmacopoeia of the United States, the National Formulary, or the American Homeopathic Pharmacopoeia. The board may sell at special prices under the regulations of the board, to United States Armed Forces facilities which are located on United States Armed Forces installations and are conducted pursuant to the authority and regulations of the United States Armed Forces. All other sales by such stores shall be at retail, except that incentives, such as coupons or discounts on certain products, may be offered to unlicensed customers of the board as provided under sections 207(m) and 493(24)(ii)(B). A person entitled to purchase liquor at wholesale prices may purchase the liquor at any Pennsylvania Liquor Store upon tendering cash, check or credit card or, in accordance with regulations of the board, upon payment within thirty days of the date of sale, for the full amount of the purchase. For this purpose, the board shall issue a discount card to each licensee identifying such licensee as a person authorized to purchase liquor at wholesale prices. 20250SB0519PN0482 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Such discount card shall be retained by the licensee. The board may contract through the Commonwealth bidding process for delivery to wholesale licensees at the expense of the licensee receiving the delivery. In addition, the board shall establish a program under which wholesale licensees are provided a discount if the licensee picks up its purchases at board-specified locations, including its warehouse. The board may set whatever parameters that it deems appropriate, including the amount of the discount or discounts and minimum purchase requirements.(b.1) The board may contract with a licensed transporter for hire through the Commonwealth bidding process for delivery to retail licensees and permit holders at the expense of the licensee or permit holder receiving delivery. Payment shall be by credit card or electronic fund transfer [only] and may occur no later than the time of delivery[.] or, in accordance with regulations of the board, within thirty days of the date of delivery.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0519PN0482 - 3 - 12345678910111213141516171819